Hawaii statutes.
§334-2.5 Contracts for facilities and
services. (a) The director may contract with any person for:

(1) The development or operation of private in-state
psychiatric facilities;

(2) The placement of patients in existing private or
public psychiatric facilities; and

(3) The provision of:

(A) Secure psychiatric rehabilitation
services;

(B) Crisis intervention and stabilization
services;

(C) Intensive treatment and wraparound
services;

(D) Diversion services;

(E) Special treatment facilities or therapeutic
living programs as defined in section 334-1;

(F) Case management services;

(G) Housing services;

(H) Outreach services, with priority for
outreach services intended to help homeless individuals with serious and
persistent mental health challenges reside in homeless facilities, permanent
dwelling units, or other facilities and avoid returning to homelessness; and

(I) Other mental health treatment and
rehabilitation services.

(b) The department may operate or contract for
a secure psychiatric rehabilitation program for individuals who require
intensive therapeutic treatment and rehabilitation in a secure setting. The
services authorized by this section shall be for persons:

(1) Involuntarily hospitalized under this chapter for
whom the services cannot be reimbursed, covered, or provided by an insurer,
plan, or other person;

(2) Committed to the custody of the director under
chapter 704; and

(3) Appropriately hospitalized under chapter 704 or
706.

The director shall be responsible for the
appropriate placement of all persons placed in facilities or services
contracted for or operated by the director under paragraphs (1) through (3).

Any such person placed in a facility or
services contracted for or operated by the director who leaves or remains away
from the facility or services, without permission, may be apprehended and
returned to the facility or services by any employee of the department or by
any law enforcement officer without any warrant or further proceeding.

(c) The department shall:

(1) See that patients who receive services under
contract or provided directly by the department pursuant to subsection (a)
receive the care and treatment for which the department has contracted or for
which appropriate services are provided directly by the department;

(2) Make periodic reviews of the records of each
person committed to the director’s custody or hospitalized pursuant to this
chapter, chapter 704, or chapter 706;

(3) In suitable cases, discharge or place on
authorized absence persons committed to the director’s custody or hospitalized
pursuant to this chapter, chapter 704, or chapter 706; and

(4) Keep a medical record of each person committed to
the director’s custody or hospitalized pursuant to this chapter, chapter 704,
or chapter 706. [L 1999, c 119, §2; am L 2013, c 232, §2; am L 2016, c 186, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next